src/morphology/incoming/kawe-verb-stems.lexc
!! Verbs
!  -----
!! Verbs in Mohawk language are actions.
!! -----------------------VERBS ---------------------------------------

LEXICON VerbStem
<0:rootStart>   VerbRoots   ;



LEXICON VerbRoots

<{athonte} "@P.CC.Two@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to hear smth, p. 11

<{ehyahron} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to raise, grow, p 1

<{itahw} "@P.CC.Eight@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to sleep, p. 12

<{ekahw} "@P.CC.Eight@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to like the taste, p.13
 
<{itehr} "@P.CC.Two@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to pity smb, p. 21
 
<{i'tehhyot} "@P.CC.Four@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to pile, to stack smth

<{ken} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to see smb, p. 18

<{khonni} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to cook, p 1

<{onni} "@P.CC.One@" "@U.VerbType.Red@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to make smth, p. 5

<{rohrok} "@P.CC.Two@" "@U.VerbType.Purple@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to watch smb, p. 19

<{yo'ten} "@P.CC.Two@" "@U.VerbType.Blue@" >   VerbSuffixes; !! to work, p. 10
